Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.258

County treasurer—Duties.

The county treasurer shall collect all mosquito control district assessments, and the duties and responsibilities herein imposed upon him or her shall be among the duties and responsibilities of his or her office for which his or her bond is given as county treasurer. The collection and disposition of revenue from such assessments and the depositary thereof shall be the same as for tax revenues of such districts as provided in RCW 17.28.270.

[ 2011 c 336 s 468; 1959 c 64 s 10.]